Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 10 Communications Systems
12-10-320. Acts 1985, No. 683, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1826.

Be of such series as the ordinance provides;

Mature on such date or dates not exceeding thirty (30) years from date of the bonds as the ordinance provides;

Bear interest at such rate or rates as the ordinance provides;

Be in such denominations as the ordinance provides;

Be in such form either coupon or fully registered without coupon as the ordinance provides;

Carry such registration and exchangeability privileges as the ordinance provides;

Be payable in such medium of payment and at such place or places within or without the state as the ordinance provides;

Be subject to such terms of redemption as the ordinance provides;

Be sold at public or private sale as the ordinance provides; and

Be entitled to such priorities on the income, revenues, and receipts generated by the emergency telephone service charge as the ordinance provides.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Public safety answer points” for “911 centers” in the section heading; in (a), inserted “with approval from the Arkansas 911 Board” and substituted “public safety answering point” for “911 public safety communications center”; rewrote (d); and added (h).

Publisher's Notes. For current provisions concerning the former subject matter of this section before the 2019 amendment, see §12-10-318(c).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Direct access to 911 services required for multiline telephone systems” for “911 centers — Federal, state, local, etc. funds” in the section heading, and rewrote the section.

The ordinance may provide for the execution of a trust indenture or other agreement with a bank or trust company located within or without the state to set forth the undertakings of the political subdivision.

The ordinance or such agreement may include provisions for the custody and investment of the proceeds of the bonds and for the deposits and handling of income, revenues, and receipts for the purpose of payment and security of the bonds and for other purposes.

The Arkansas 911 Board may cooperate and contract with the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to provide for the payment of the principal of, premium if any, interest on, and trustee's and paying agent's fees in connection with bonds issued to finance the acquisition, construction, and operation of the next generation 911 infrastructure for the purposes of establishing a statewide ESINet as required by this subchapter with the review of the General Assembly.

A covered multiline telephone system shall allow, as a default setting, any station equipped with dialing facilities to directly initiate a 911 call without requiring a user to dial any other digit, code, prefix, suffix, or trunk access code.

A business service user that owns or controls a multiline telephone system or an equivalent system that uses voice over internet protocol enabled service and provides outbound dialing capacity or access shall configure the multiline telephone system or equivalent system to allow a person initiating a 911 call on the multiline telephone system to directly access 911 service by dialing the digits “911” without an additional digit, code, prefix, suffix, or trunk access code.

A public or private entity that installs or operates a multiline telephone system shall ensure that the multiline telephone system is connected to allow a person initiating a 911 call on the multiline telephone system to directly access 911 service by dialing the digits “911” without an additional digit, code, prefix, suffix, or trunk access code.

(1)Revenue generated under §§12-10-318 and 12-10-326 and transferred from the Arkansas Emergency Telephone Services Board or the Arkansas Public Safety Trust Fund to the Arkansas 911 Board shall be used only for reasonably necessary costs that enhance, operate, and maintain 911 service in the State of Arkansas under the direction of the Arkansas 911 Board.

The engineering, installation, and recurring costs necessary to implement, operate, and maintain a 911 telephone system;

The costs necessary for forwarding and transfer capabilities of calls from the public safety answering point to dispatch centers or to other public safety answering points;

Engineering, construction, lease, or purchase costs to lease, purchase, build, remodel, or refurbish a public safety answering point and for necessary emergency and uninterruptable power supplies for the public safety answering point;

Personnel costs, including salary and benefits, of each position charged with supervision and operation of the public safety answering point and system;

Purchase, lease, operation, and maintenance of consoles, telephone and communications equipment owned or operated by the political subdivisions and physically located within and for the use of the public safety answering point, and radio or microwave towers and equipment with lines that terminate in the public safety answering point;

Purchase, lease, operation, and maintenance of computers, data processing equipment, associated equipment, and leased audio or data lines assigned to and operated by the public safety answering point for the purposes of coordinating or forwarding calls, dispatch, or recordkeeping of 911 calls;

Supplies, equipment, public safety answering point personnel training, vehicles, and vehicle maintenance, if such items are solely and directly related to and incurred by the political subdivision in mapping, addressing, and readdressing for the operation of the public safety answering point; and

Training costs and all costs related to training under this subchapter.

This subsection does not authorize a political subdivision to purchase emergency response vehicles, law enforcement vehicles, or other political subdivision vehicles from such funds.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “coordinating or forwarding calls” for “coordinating, forwarding of calls” in (a)(1)(F); and added (a)(1)(H).

The 2019 amendment rewrote the section.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1828; Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 32; 2019, No. 660, § 3.

12-10-317. Public safety answering point — Operation — Rights, duties, liabilities, etc., of service providers.

(1)Each service provider shall forward to any public safety answering point equipped for enhanced 911 service the telephone number and street address of any telephone used to place a 911 call.

Subscriber information provided in accordance with this subsection shall be used only for the purpose of responding to requests for emergency service response from public or private safety agencies, for the investigation of false or intentionally misleading reports of incidents requiring emergency service response, or for other lawful purposes.

A service provider, agents of a service provider, political subdivision, or officials or employees of a political subdivision are not liable to any person who uses the enhanced 911 service established under this subchapter for release of the information specified in this section or for failure of equipment or procedure in connection with enhanced 911 service or basic 911 service.

(1)The public safety answering point and dispatch center shall be notified in advance by an authorized service provider representative of any routine maintenance work to be performed that may affect the 911 system's reliability or capacity.

The work shall be performed during the public safety answering point's off-peak hours.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1828; Acts 2019, No. 660, § 3.

12-10-318. Emergency telephone service charges — Imposition — Liability — Public safety charge.

(1)(A)When so authorized by a majority of the persons voting within the political subdivision in accordance with the law, the governing authority of each political subdivision may levy an emergency telephone service charge in the amount assessed by the political subdivision on a per-access-line basis as of January 1, 1997, or the amount up to five percent (5%) of the tariff rate, except that any political subdivision with a population of less than twenty-seven thousand five hundred (27,500) according to the 1990 Federal Decennial Census may, by a majority vote of the electors voting on the issue, levy an emergency telephone charge in an amount assessed by the political subdivision on a per-access-line basis as of January 1, 1997, or an amount up to twelve percent (12%) of the tariff rate.

The governing authority of a political subdivision that has been authorized under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section to levy an emergency telephone service charge in an amount up to twelve percent (12%) of the tariff rate may decrease the percentage rate to not less than four percent (4%) of the tariff rate for those telephone service users that are served by a telephone company with fewer than two hundred (200) access lines in this state as of the date of the election conducted under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section.

Upon its own initiative, the governing authority of the political subdivision may call such a special election to be held in accordance with §7-11-201 et seq.

(1)(A)There is levied a commercial mobile radio service public safety charge in an amount of one dollar and thirty cents ($1.30) per month per commercial mobile radio service connection that has a place of primary use within the State of Arkansas.

There is levied a voice over internet protocol public safety charge in an amount of one dollar and thirty cents ($1.30) per month per voice over internet protocol connection that has a place of primary use within the State of Arkansas.

There is levied a nontraditional telephone public safety charge in an amount of one dollar and thirty cents ($1.30) per month per nontraditional service connection that has a place of primary use within the State of Arkansas.

The service charge levied in subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section and collected by commercial mobile radio service providers that provide mobile telecommunications services as defined by the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, Pub. L. No. 106-252, as in effect on January 1, 2001, shall be collected pursuant to the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, Pub. L. No. 106-252.

(A)The service charges collected under subdivisions (b)(1)(A)-(C) of this section shall be remitted to the Arkansas Emergency Telephone Services Board within thirty (30) days after the end of the month in which the fees are collected.

(i)After September 30, 2019, the public safety charge collected under subdivisions (b)(1)(A)-(C) of this section shall be remitted to the Arkansas Public Safety Trust Fund.

Due to the confidential and proprietary nature of the information submitted by commercial mobile radio service providers, the information shall be retained by the independent auditor in confidence, shall be subject to review only by the Auditor of State, and shall not be subject to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., nor released to any third party.

The information collected by the independent auditor shall be released only in aggregate amounts that do not identify or allow identification of numbers of subscribers or revenues attributable to an individual commercial mobile radio service provider.

In order to provide additional funding for the public safety answering point, the political subdivision may receive and appropriate any federal, state, county, or municipal funds, as well as funds from a private source, and may expend the funds for the purposes of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1826; Acts 1995, No. 627, § 1; 1997, No. 106, § 1; 1997, No. 810, § 2; 1997, No. 952, § 1; 1999, No. 46, § 1; 2001, No. 907, § 3; 2003, No. 111, § 1; 2003, No. 1792, § 1; 2005, No. 1997, § 1; 2005, No. 2145, § 16; 2007, No. 582, § 2; 2007, No. 1049, § 33; 2009, No. 1221, § 2; 2009, No. 1480, § 48; 2011, No. 640, § 1; 2013, No. 623, §§ 3-5; 2013, No. 1170, § 1; 2015, No. 919, § 2; 2019, No. 660, § 4; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5834, 5835.

12-10-319, 12-10-320. [Repealed.]

12-10-321. Public safety answering points — Bonds.

The governing authority of the political subdivision shall have power to incur debt and issue bonds with approval from the Arkansas 911 Board for 911 systems and public safety answering point implementation and future major capital items.

The bonds shall be negotiable instruments and shall be solely the obligations of each political subdivision and not of the State of Arkansas.

The bonds and income thereof shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Arkansas.

The bonds shall not be general obligations but shall be special obligations payable from all or a specified portion of the income revenues and receipts of the political subdivision and designated by the political subdivision to be dedicated for the local 911 system and public safety answering point.

(1)The bonds shall be authorized and issued by ordinance of the governing authority of each political subdivision.

The bonds shall:

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1826; Acts 2019, No. 660, § 6.

12-10-322. Direct access to 911 services required for multiline telephone systems.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1826; Acts 2019, No. 660, § 6.

12-10-323. Authorized expenditures of revenues.

Reasonably necessary costs shall be determined by the Arkansas 911 Board and include the following:

Expenditure of revenue distributed by the Arkansas 911 Board for purposes not identified in this section is prohibited.

Failure to comply with this section may result in the Arkansas 911 Board's withholding funds from the public safety answering point's quarterly funding distribution.

Appropriations of funds from any source other than §§12-10-318,12-10-321, and12-10-326 may be expended for any purpose and may supplement the authorized expenditures of this section and may fund other activities of the public safety answering point not associated with the provision of emergency services.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1827; Acts 1989, No. 524, § 1; 1991, No. 1196, § 5; 1997, No. 952, § 2; 2003, No. 176, § 1; 2011, No. 640, § 2; 2019, No. 660, § 6.

12-10-324. Response to call — Entrance procedures.

When responding to a 911 emergency call received at a public safety answering point, public safety officers of public safety agencies may use reasonable and necessary means to enter any dwelling, dwelling unit, or other structure without the express permission of the owner when:

The dwelling or structure is believed to be the geographical location of the telephone used to place the 911 emergency call as determined by an automatic locator or number identifier; and

Only after reasonable efforts have been made to arouse and alert any inhabitants or occupants of their presence and the officers have reason to believe that circumstances exist which pose a clear threat to the health of any person or they have reason to believe there may be a person in need of emergency medical attention present in the dwelling or structure who is unable to respond to their efforts.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1032, § 1.

12-10-325. Training standards.

A public safety agency, a public safety answering point, or a dispatch center may provide training opportunities for public safety answering point and dispatch center personnel through the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training and the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy.

The division shall develop training standards for telecommunicators, dispatchers, supervisors, and instructors in Arkansas in consultation with the Association of Public-Safety Communications Officials International, Inc., and the Arkansas 911 Board and submit the training standards to the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training for approval.

Training for instructors may include without limitation instructor development, course development, leadership development, and other appropriate 911 instructor training.

Training for telecommunicators, dispatchers, and supervisors may include without limitation:

Call taking;

Customer service;

Stress management;

Mapping;

Call processing;

Telecommunication and radio equipment training;

Training with devices for the deaf;

Autism;

National Incident Management System training;

Incident Command System training;

National Center for Missing and Exploited Children training;

National Emergency Number Association training;

Association of Public-Safety Communications Officials International, Inc., training; and

Other appropriate 911 dispatcher and supervisor training.

An entity that provides training under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall:

Retain training records created under this section; and

Deliver an annual report to the Arkansas 911 Board of training provided by the entity to verify the dispatcher and supervisor training reported as completed by each public safety answering point annually under § 12-10-318.

A private safety agency may attend training or receive instruction at the invitation of the division.

The division may assess a fee on a private safety agency invited to attend training or receive instruction under this subsection to reimburse the division for costs associated with the training or instruction.

All public safety answering points shall have at least sixty percent (60%) of telecommunicators working in the public safety answering point trained.

All telecommunicators working at a public safety answering point who have worked as a telecommunicator for one (1) year or longer shall be trained.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted the second occurrence of “communications” for “communication” in (a)(1); inserted “supervisors” in (a)(2) and “and supervisors” in the introductory language of (a)(3)(B); in (a)(3)(B), added roman numeral designations and inserted (a)(3)(B)(ix) through (xiii); inserted “and supervisor” in (a)(3)(B)(xiv); in (a)(4), substituted “shall” for “may”, inserted designation (A), and added (B); and rewrote (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 660 rewrote (a); added (c); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted“Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training and the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy” in (a)(1), and substituted “division” for “Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy” in (a)(2); and substituted “division” for “commission” throughout (b).

Conducted in person by a consumer at a business location of a seller in this state;

Treated as occurring in this state for purposes of the gross receipts tax provided under § 26-52-521(b); or

Taxable under § 26-53-106;

“Prepaid wireless public safety charge” means the charge for prepaid wireless telecommunications service that is required to be collected by a seller from a consumer under subsection (b) of this section;

“Prepaid wireless service” means any prepaid wireless service sold to consumers in the state.

“Prepaid wireless service” includes without limitation:

Prepaid wireless cards;

Telephones or other devices that are loaded with prepaid wireless minutes; and

Any transaction that reloads a prepaid wireless card or a telephone or other device with prepaid wireless minutes;

“Provider” means a person that provides prepaid wireless telecommunications service under a license issued by the Federal Communications Commission;

“Retail transaction” means each purchase of prepaid wireless telecommunications service from a seller for any purpose other than resale.

“Retail transaction” includes a separate purchase of prepaid wireless telecommunications service that is paid contemporaneously with another purchase of prepaid wireless telecommunications service if separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or similar document provided by the seller to the consumer at the time of sale.

“Retail transaction” includes a recharge as defined in § 26-52-314 of prepaid wireless telecommunications service;

“Seller” means a person who sells prepaid wireless telecommunications service to another person; and

“Wireless telecommunications service” means a commercial mobile radio service as defined under § 12-10-303.

If the amount of the prepaid wireless public safety charge is stated separately on an invoice, receipt, or similar document provided to the consumer at the time of sale by the seller, the amount of the prepaid wireless public safety charge shall not be included in the base for measuring any tax, fee, surcharge, or other charge that is imposed by the state, a political subdivision of the state, or an intergovernmental agency.

To ensure there is no overlap of the E911 charge previously assessed under this section before October 1, 2019, and the new public safety charge assessed under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, a seller shall continue to collect the public safety charge in effect one (1) day before October 1, 2019, through September 30, 2019.

The funds collected through September 30, 2019, shall be remitted according to the same terms and process as previously remitted under this section before October 1, 2019.

On and after October 1, 2019, a seller shall begin collecting the public safety charge under subdivision (b)(1) of this section and shall remit the funds as prescribed in subsection (c) of this section.

(1)A seller shall electronically report and pay one hundred percent (100%) of the prepaid wireless public safety charge plus any penalties and interest due to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration in the same manner and at the same time as the gross receipts tax under the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, § 26-52-101 et seq.

The Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-101 et seq., applies to a prepaid wireless public safety charge.

If the Department of Finance and Administration becomes aware of any seller who is not collecting and remitting the public safety charge, the department shall provide notice of the requirements under this section and the associated penalties for failure to pay the charge.

The department shall pay all remitted prepaid wireless public safety funds to the Arkansas Public Safety Trust Fund on or before the fifteenth business day of December 2019 and on or before the fifteenth business day of each month thereafter.

A provider or seller is not liable for damages to a person resulting from or incurred in connection with:

Providing or failing to provide 911 service;

Identifying or failing to identify the telephone number, address, location, or name associated with a person or device that is accessing or attempting to access 911 service; or

Providing lawful assistance to a federal, state, or local investigator or law enforcement officer conducting a lawful investigation or other law enforcement activity.

A provider or seller is not liable for civil damages or criminal liability in connection with:

The development, design, installation, operation, maintenance, performance, or provision of 911 service; or

The release of subscriber information to a governmental entity as required by this subchapter.

The prepaid wireless public safety charge imposed by this section shall be the only E911 funding obligation imposed for prepaid wireless telecommunications service in this state.

Except for the prepaid wireless public safety charge imposed under this section, no other tax, fee, surcharge, or other charge shall be imposed upon prepaid wireless telecommunication services by the state, a political subdivision of the state, or an intergovernmental agency for the purpose of implementing and supporting emergency telephone services.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 660 substituted “public safety charge” for “E911 service charges” in the section heading, and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (d)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 660, § 11: Oct. 1, 2019. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 4 and 8 of this act are effective on and after October 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 640, § 3; 2015, No. 919, § 3; 2019, No. 660, § 7; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5836, 5837.

12-10-326. Prepaid wireless public safety charge — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Consumer” means a person who purchases prepaid wireless telecommunications service in a retail transaction;

“Occurring in this state” means a retail transaction that is:

(1)For each retail transaction occurring in this state, a seller of prepaid wireless services shall collect from the consumer a public safety charge equal to ten percent (10%) of the value of the prepaid wireless service.

(A)The amount of the prepaid wireless public safety charge shall be stated separately on an invoice, receipt, or similar document that is provided to the consumer at the time of sale by the seller or otherwise disclosed to the consumer.

A seller that meets the prompt payment requirements of §26-52-503 may deduct and retain two percent (2%) of the prepaid wireless public safety charge.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 623, § 6; 2019, No. 660, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 3375.

12-10-327. Restriction on creation of public safety answering point.

A new public safety answering point shall not be established unless the new public safety answering point is established as a result of:

Consolidation with an existing public safety answering point; or

Replacement of an existing public safety answering point.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “until July 1, 2020” following “established” in the introductory language.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 574, § 1; 2019, No. 660, § 9.

12-10-328. 911 addressing authority — Data maintenance.

A chief executive shall designate a 911 addressing authority that shall create and maintain street centerline and address point data in a geographic information system format.

The street centerline and address point data created under subsection (a) of this section shall:

Be compatible with the standard database requirements and best practices developed by the Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office as part of the Arkansas Master Address Program; and

Be transmitted to the office by a method and with a frequency agreed upon by the office and the 911 addressing authority designated under subsection (a) of this section.

Cross References. State police, criminal investigation and prevention of crime, §12-8-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 663, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Statewide Radio Communications System

12-10-308. Response to requests for emergency response inside and outside jurisdiction.

12-10-313. Restrictions and nonemergency telephone number.